Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1320

Subjects covered.

The following subjects are covered in whole or in part in chapter 23.95 RCW:

(1) Delivery of record;

(2) Filing with secretary of state;

(3) Name of entity;

(4) Registered agent of entity; and

(5) Miscellaneous provisions, including reservation or power to amend or repeal and supplemental principles of law.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1320.]